Hawaii statutes.
§456-9 Fees and administrative fines.
(a) The attorney general shall charge and collect the following fees for:

(1) Issuing the original commission, $40; and

(2) Renewing the commission, $40.

These fees may be adjusted, and any other fees
may be established and adjusted, by adopting rules pursuant to chapter 91.

(b) The court fees for filing a copy of a
commission and for each certificate of authentication shall be specified by the
supreme court.

(c) The attorney general may impose and
collect the following administrative fines for a notary public's failure to:

(1) Maintain an official seal of one type, either a
single engraved seal or a single rubber stamp facsimile seal, on which shall be
inscribed the name of the notary public, the commission number of the notary
public, and the words "notary public" and "State of Hawaii"
only, $20;

(2) Surrender the notary public's seal and
certificate to the attorney general within ninety days of resignation, removal
from office, or the expiration of a term without renewal, $200;

(3) Authenticate every acknowledgment or jurat with a
certificate that shall be signed and dated by the notary, include the printed
name and official stamp or seal of the notary, identify the jurisdiction in
which the notarial act is performed, describe in close proximity to the
acknowledgment or jurat the document being notarized, and state the number of
pages and date of the document, $500;

(4) Record all of the notary public's transactions as
prescribed by section 456-15 and applicable rules, $200;

(5) Surrender the notary public's record books to the
attorney general within ninety days of the end date of the commission,
resignation, or removal from office, $500; and

(6) Notify the attorney general within ten days after
loss, misplacement, or theft of the notary public's seal, stamp, or any record
book, inform the appropriate law enforcement agency in the case of theft, and
deliver a copy of the law enforcement agency's report of the theft to the
attorney general, $20.

(d) The foregoing moneys collected by the
attorney general pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the notaries
public revolving fund established by section 456-9.5, except that if that fund
is terminated, the foregoing moneys shall thereafter be deposited with the
director of finance to the credit of the general fund. [L 1941, c 322, pt of
§4; RL 1945, §7669; am L 1953, c 30, §2; am L 1955, c 172, §1; RL 1955, §168-9;
am L 1959, c 265, §17; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §14; am L 1963, c 114, §1; HRS
§456-9; am L 1976, c 146, §2; am L 1998, c 290, §6; am L 2008, c 175, §6; am L
2013, c 29, §2]

Cross References

Modification of fees, see §92-28.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next